Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Chapter 36. Fertilizer.

§ 3.2-3600.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context requires a different meaning:

“AAPFCO” means the Association of American Plant Food Control Officials.

“Anaerobic digestion” means the controlled anaerobic biological decomposition of organic waste material to produce biogas and digestate.

“AOAC International” means the Association of Analytical Communities, formerly the Association of Official Analytical Chemists.

“Brand” means a term, design, trademark or product name under which a regulated product is distributed.

“Bulk” means in nonpackaged form.

“Bulk fertilizer” means a fertilizer distributed in a nonpackaged form.

“Commercial fertilizer” means a fertilizer distributed for farm use, or for any other use, other than any specialty fertilizer use.

“Compost” means a biologically stable material derived from the composting process.

“Composting” means the biological decomposition of organic matter through a process that inhibits pathogens, viable weed seeds, and odors, accomplished by mixing and piling so as to promote aerobic decay, anaerobic decay, or both aerobic and anaerobic decay.

“Contractor-applicator” means any person required to hold a permit to apply any regulated product pursuant to §

3.2-3608

.

“Custom medium” means a horticultural growing medium that is prepared to the exact specifications of the person who will be planting in the medium and delivered to that person without intermediate or further distribution.

“Deficiency” means the amount of nutrient found by analysis to be less than that guaranteed, which may result from a lack of nutrient ingredients, or from lack of uniformity.

“Digestate” means a biologically stable material derived from the process of anaerobic digestion.

“Distribute” means to import, consign, manufacture, produce, compound, mix, blend, or in any way alter, the chemical or physical characteristics of a regulated product, or to offer for sale, sell, barter, warehouse or otherwise supply regulated product in the Commonwealth.

“Distributor” means any person who distributes.

“Fertilizer” means any substance containing one or more recognized plant nutrients, which is used for its plant nutrient content, and which is designed for use, or claimed to have value, in promoting plant growth. Fertilizer does not include unmanipulated animal and vegetable manures, marl, lime, limestone, and other products exempted by regulation.

“Fertilizer material” means a fertilizer that: (i) contains important quantities of no more than one of the primary plant nutrients: nitrogen (N), phosphate (P205) and potash (K20); (ii) has 85 percent or more of its plant nutrient content present in the form of a single chemical compound; or (iii) is derived from a plant or animal residue, a by-product, or a natural material deposit that has been processed or conditioned in such a way that its content of plant nutrients has not been materially changed, except by purification and concentration.

“Grade” means the percentage of total nitrogen (N), available phosphate (P205) and soluble potash (K20), stated in whole numbers in the same terms, order, and percentages as in the guaranteed analysis, except that fertilizer materials, specialty fertilizers, bone meal, manures and similar raw materials may be guaranteed in fractional units.

“Guaranteed analysis” means the minimum percentage of plant nutrients claimed as required by this chapter to be displayed on the label of a regulated product.

“Guarantor” means the person whose name appears on the label of a regulated product.

“Horticultural growing medium” means any substance or mixture of substances that is promoted as or is intended to function as an artificial soil for the managed growth of horticultural crops.

“Industrial co-product” means any industrial waste or byproduct, including exceptional quality biosolids and waste treatment residuals, that can be beneficially recycled for its plant nutrient content or soil amendment characteristics, that meets the definition of fertilizer, soil amendment, or horticultural growing medium.

“Investigational allowance” means an allowance for variations, inherent in the taking, preparation, and analysis of an official sample.

“Label” means the display of all written, printed, or graphic matter, upon the immediate container, or a statement accompanying a regulated product, including an invoice.

“Labeling” means all written, printed, or graphic matter, upon or accompanying any regulated product, including invoices, advertisements, brochures, posters, television and radio announcements, and internet content used in promoting the sale of the regulated product.

“Lawn fertilizer” means any fertilizer intended for nonagricultural use on newly established turf areas from sod or seed during the first growing season, turf areas being repaired or renovated, and turf areas where soil tests performed within the past three years indicate a nutrient deficiency.

“Lawn maintenance fertilizer” means any fertilizer intended for the nonagricultural routine maintenance of turf.

“Licensee” means the person who receives a license to distribute any regulated product under the provisions of this chapter.

“Lot” means an identifiable quantity of produced material that can be sampled officially according to AOAC International procedures, up to and including a freight car load or 50 tons maximum, or that amount contained in a single vehicle, or that amount delivered under a single invoice.

“Manipulated manure” means animal or vegetable manure that is ground, pelletized, mechanically dried, packaged, supplemented with plant nutrients or other substances other than phosphorus, or otherwise treated in a manner to assist with the sale or distribution of the manure as a fertilizer or soil or plant additive.

“Manufacturer” means any person who manufactures, produces, compounds, mixes, blends, or in any way alters the chemical or physical characteristics of any regulated product.

“Mixed fertilizer” means a fertilizer containing any combination or mixture of fertilizer materials.

“Official analysis” means the analysis of an official sample, made by the Commissioner.

“Official sample” means the sample of regulated product taken by the Commissioner.

“Percent” or “percentage” means the percentage by weight.

“Primary nutrient” includes total nitrogen (N), available phosphate (P205), and soluble potash (K20).

“Quantity statement” means the net weight (mass), net volume (liquid or dry), count or other form of measurement of a commodity.

“Registrant” means the person who registers regulated products, under the provisions of this chapter.

“Regulated product” means any product governed by this chapter, including any fertilizer, specialty fertilizer, soil amendment, digestate, and horticultural growing medium.

“Soil amendment” means any substance or mixture of substances intended to improve the physical, chemical, biochemical, biological, or other characteristics of the soil. The following are exempt from the definition of “soil amendment”: fertilizer, unmanipulated or composted animal and vegetable manures, horticultural growing media, agricultural liming materials, unmixed mulch and unmixed peat.

“Specialty fertilizer” means a fertilizer distributed for nonfarm use, including use on home gardens, lawns, shrubbery, flowers, golf courses, municipal parks, cemeteries, greenhouses and nurseries.

“Stop sale, use, removal, or seizure order” means an order that prohibits the distributor from selling, relocating, using, or disposing of a lot of regulated product, or portion thereof, in any manner, until the Commissioner or the court gives written permission to sell, relocate, use or dispose of the lot of regulated product or portion thereof.

“Ton” means a unit of 2000 pounds avoirdupois weight.

“Turf” means nonagricultural land that is planted as closely mowed, managed grass and includes golf courses, parks, cemeteries, publicly owned lands, and residential, commercial, or industrial property.

“Unmanipulated manure” means substances composed of the excreta of domestic animals, or domestic fowls, that has not been processed or conditioned in any manner including processing or conditioning by drying, grinding, pelleting, shredding, addition of plant food, mixing artificially with any material or materials (other than those that have been used for bedding, sanitary or feeding purposes for such animals or fowls), or by any other means.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.2; 2002, c. 473; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 341, 353, 552, 564; 2022, cc. 538, 539.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2011, cc. 341 and 353, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall provide, no later than December 15, 2011, a report to the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources concerning the use of slowly available nitrogen in lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer. The report shall (i) conduct an assessment of the most effective means to encourage the use of slowly available nitrogen in lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer, (ii) determine the most appropriate percentages of slowly available nitrogen to be included in lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer, (iii) recommend the most appropriate effective date for any change, (iv) calculate the costs to the manufacturer and consumer, and (v) provide a review of any other issues related to the use of slowly available nitrogen in lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer. The Department shall consult with the Department of Conservation and Recreation and the Chesapeake Bay Commission and, at the Department’s discretion, may convene a technical advisory committee of stakeholders concerning the development and content of the report.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 341 and 353 are identical, and added the definitions of “lawn fertilizer,” “lawn maintenance fertilizer,” “manipulated manure,” and “turf.”

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and added the definitions for “AAPFCO,” “AOAC,” and “Lot”; in the definition for “Composting,” combined the former two sentences into one, and therein substituted “through a process that inhibits pathogens, viable weed seeds, and odors” for “It may be”; in the definition for “Contractor-applicator,” deleted “distribute or” following “hold a permit to”; in the definition for “Guaranteed analysis,” substituted “the minimum percentage of plant nutrients claimed as required” for “that information required”; in the definition for “Industrial co-product,” substituted “any industrial waste or byproduct, including exceptional quality biosolids and waste treatment residuals, that can be beneficially recycled for its plant nutrient content or soil amendment characteristics” for “a product derived from an industrial process” and deleted “soil conditioner” following “soil amendment”; in the definition for “Labeling,” inserted “and internet content” and made a related change; in the definition for “Official sample,” deleted “and designated as ‘official’ by the Board” from the end; in the definition for “Regulated product,” deleted “soil conditioner” following “soil amendment”; rewrote the definition for “Soil amendment”; and deleted the definition for “Soil conditioner.”

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendments by cc. 538 and 539 are identical, and added “Anaerobic digestion” and “Digestate” definitions; and inserted “digestate” in the “Regulated product” definition.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1A M.J. Agriculture, § 11.

§ 3.2-3601.
Authority of the Board and the Commissioner to adopt regulations.

The Board may adopt such regulations as are necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Such regulations may include investigational allowances, definitions, records, and manufacturing practices, and the distribution and storage of regulated product prior to final sale.

The Commissioner may adopt as a regulation:

The Official Fertilizer Terms, Definitions, and Standards adopted by AAPFCO;

The methods of sampling and analysis for regulated products adopted by AOAC International; and

Any method of sampling and analysis for a regulated product developed by the Department or adopted by agencies of the federal government, agencies of other states, the Division of Consolidated Laboratories or other commercial laboratories accredited by the Food and Drug Administration, or the U.S. Department of Agriculture.

Such regulations adopted by the Commissioner shall be effective upon filing with the Registrar of Regulations, who shall publish the regulation as a final regulation in the Virginia Register of Regulations. The regulation shall contain a preamble stating that the Board will receive, consider, and respond to petitions by any interested person at any time with respect to reconsideration or revision of such regulation. The Commissioner shall provide notice by first-class mail of regulations adopted by him pursuant to this section to all manufacturers of currently registered regulated product.

The Board, after giving notice in the Virginia Register of Regulations, may reconsider and revise the regulation adopted by the Commissioner. Such revised regulation shall be effective upon filing with the Registrar of Regulations, who shall publish the regulation as a final regulation in the Virginia Register of Regulations.

Neither the provisions of the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) nor public participation guidelines adopted pursuant thereto shall apply to the adoption, reconsideration, or revision of any regulation adopted pursuant to subsections B, C, and D of this section.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.4; 1995, c. 104; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 552, 564.

Cross references.

As to exemptions, generally, from the Administrative Process Act, see §

2.2-4002

.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and in subdivision B 1, substituted “Terms, Definitions, and Standards adopted by the AAPFCO” for “Terms and Definitions adopted by the Association of American Plant Food Control Officials”; in subdivision B 2, substituted “adopted by AOAC International” for “adopted by the Association of Official Analytical Chemists”; and in subdivision B 3, deleted “or the Association of Official Analytical Chemists” from the end and made a related change.

§ 3.2-3602.
Local government regulation of fertilizer.

No locality shall regulate the registration, packaging, labeling, sale, use, application, storage or distribution of fertilizers except by ordinance as provided for in the requirements of the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.), the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§

62.1-44.15:51

et seq.), the Stormwater Management Act (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.) or other nonpoint source regulations adopted by the Department of Environmental Quality or the State Water Control Board. The provisions of this section shall not preempt the adoption, amendment, or enforcement of the Statewide Fire Prevention Code pursuant to §

27-97

and the Uniform Statewide Building Code pursuant to §

36-98

.

The Commissioner may enter into an agreement with a locality to provide oversight and data collection assistance related to the requirements of certified contractor-applicators pursuant to §

3.2-3602.1

.

History.

2007, c. 563, § 3.1-106.4:1; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 341, 353; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2020, c. 413.

Editor’s note.

For complete transition provisions related to transfer of certain water quality programs (stormwater management, erosion and sediment control, and the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas) formerly administered by the Department of Conservation and Recreation, to the Department of Environmental Quality, see Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cls. 4 through 14, noted in full under Article 2.3 (§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 341 and 353 are identical, and substituted “use, application, storage or distribution of fertilizers except by ordinance as provided for in the requirements of the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Act (§ 10.1-2100 et seq.), the Erosion and Sediment Control Law (§ 10.1-560 et seq.), the Stormwater Management Act (§ 10.1-603.1 et seq.) or other nonpoint source regulations adopted by the Department of Conservation and Recreation or the Soil and Water Conservation Board” for “or distribution of fertilizers” in the first sentence.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 756 and 793 are identical, and substituted “(§

62.1-44.15:67

et seq.)” for “(§ 10.1-2100 et seq.),” “(§

62.1-44.15:24

et seq.)” for “(§ 10.1-603.1 et seq.),” and “Department of Environmental Quality or the State Water Control Board” for “Department of Conservation and Recreation or the Soil and Water Conservation Board” in the first sentence.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 413 added subsection B.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Restrictions on use of fertilizer. —

Virginia locality is authorized by § 10.1-603.7 [now §

62.1-44.15:33

] and §

15.2-924.1

to adopt an ordinance regulating or prohibiting the use or application of fertilizers within its jurisdictional boundaries provided the locality makes the factual findings required by subsection A of § 10.1-603.7 [now §

62.1-44.15:33

] and determines that the ordinance is necessary to prevent any further degradation to water resources or to address specific existing water pollution. The locality also must comply with the public hearing procedures required by subsection A of § 10.1-603.7 [now § 62.1-44.15:33]. See opinion of Attorney General to James E. Barnett, Esq., York County Attorney, 09-035, 2009 Va. AG LEXIS 55 (9/1/09).

§ 3.2-3602.1.
Board authorized to adopt regulations for the application of regulated products to nonagricultural property; civil penalty.

The Board shall adopt regulations to certify the competence of (i) contractor-applicators, (ii) licensees, and (iii) employees, representatives, or agents of state agencies, localities, or other governmental entities who apply any regulated product to nonagricultural lands.

The regulations shall establish (i) training requirements; (ii) proper nutrient management practices in accordance with § 10.1-104.2, including soil analysis techniques, equipment calibration, and the timing of the application; and (iii) reporting requirements, including the submission of an annual report as specified by the Commissioner regarding the location of lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer applications. Contractor-applicators and licensees who apply lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer to more than a total of 50 acres of nonagricultural lands annually and employees, representatives, or agents of state agencies, localities, or other governmental entities who apply lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer to nonagricultural lands shall submit an annual report on or before February 1 and on a form prescribed by the Commissioner. The annual report shall include the total acreage or square footage by zip code of the land receiving lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer in the preceding calendar year. The Department shall provide for optional reporting by electronic methods. The Department shall make publicly available every year the total acreage or square footage by zip code. Any personal information collected pursuant to this section shall be exempt from the Virginia Freedom of Information Act (§

2.2-3700

et seq.), except that the Commissioner may release information that has been transformed into a statistical or aggregate form that does not allow identification of the persons who supplied, or are the subject of, particular information.

The Board may impose a civil penalty of up to $1,000 on any contractor-applicator or licensee who fails to comply with the regulations. The amount of the civil penalty shall be paid into the special fund established in §

3.2-3617

.

The Board shall form a technical advisory committee of stakeholders. The Board shall consult with the technical advisory committee of stakeholders and the Department of Conservation and Recreation in the development of the regulations.

Any person who is subject to regulation and who applies any regulated product to nonagricultural lands shall comply with the regulations within 12 months of the effective date of the regulations.

Contractor-applicators and licensees in compliance with regulations adopted by the Board pursuant to this section shall not be subject to local ordinances governing the use or application of lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer.

History.

2008, c. 686, § 3.1-106.4:2; 2011, cc. 341, 353, 552, 564; 2020, c. 413.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 686 enacted § 3.1-106.4:2, from which this section is derived. Pursuant to § 30-152, Acts 2008, c. 686 has been given effect in this section as set out above.

Acts 2008, c. 686, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall report the status of the regulations and the implementation of the program to the Chairmen of the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources and the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources by July 1, 2009, and each succeeding year until the regulations have been adopted and the program has been implemented.”

Acts 2011, cc. 341 and 353, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall provide, no later than December 15, 2011, a report to the House Committee on Agriculture, Chesapeake and Natural Resources and the Senate Committee on Agriculture, Conservation and Natural Resources concerning the use of slowly available nitrogen in lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer. The report shall (i) conduct an assessment of the most effective means to encourage the use of slowly available nitrogen in lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer, (ii) determine the most appropriate percentages of slowly available nitrogen to be included in lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer, (iii) recommend the most appropriate effective date for any change, (iv) calculate the costs to the manufacturer and consumer, and (v) provide a review of any other issues related to the use of slowly available nitrogen in lawn fertilizer and lawn maintenance fertilizer. The Department shall consult with the Department of Conservation and Recreation and the Chesapeake Bay Commission and, at the Department’s discretion, may convene a technical advisory committee of stakeholders concerning the development and content of the report.”

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 341 and 353 are identical, and rewrote the section.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and in subsection A, added the clause (i) and (ii) designations, added clause (iii) and made related changes, and deleted the last sentence, which read: “The regulations shall establish (i) training requirements and (ii) proper nutrient management practices in accordance with § 10.1-104.2, and including soil analysis techniques, equipment calibration, and the timing of the application”; added subsection B and redesingated the remaining subsections accordingly; and in subsection E, substituted “Any person who is subject to the regulation and who applies” for “Contractor-applicators and licensees who apply.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 413, in subsection B, substituted “50 acres” for “100 acres” in the second sentence and in subsection C, substituted “$1,000” for “$250” in the first sentence.

§ 3.2-3603.
Publications.

The Commissioner may publish in such forms and with such frequency as he may deem proper: (i) information concerning the distribution of fertilizers; and (ii) results of analysis based on official samples of fertilizer distributed within the Commonwealth, as compared with analysis guaranteed under §§

3.2-3600

and

3.2-3611

; and commercial value of nutrients as determined under §

3.2-3614

.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.19; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3604.
Exchanges between manufacturers.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict or avoid sales or exchanges of regulated product between importers, manufacturers, or manipulators who mix fertilizer materials for sale, or to prevent the free and unrestricted shipments of regulated product to manufacturers or manipulators who have registered their brands, and are licensed, as required by provisions of this chapter.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.20; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-3605.
License and registration year; permit year.

The license year for all distributors, the registration year for any regulated product, and the tonnage reporting year is July 1 through June 30 of the following year. Each license or registration shall expire on June 30 of the year for which it is issued, provided that the license or registration shall be valid through July 31 of the next ensuing license or registration year or until the issuance of the renewal license or registration, whichever event occurs first, if the holder has filed a properly completed renewal application with the Commissioner on or before June 30 of the year for which the current license or registration was issued.

The permit year for all contractor-applicators is April 1 through March 31 of the following year. Each permit shall expire on March 31 of the permit year for which it is issued, provided that the permit shall be valid through March 31 of the next ensuing permit year or until the issuance of the renewal permit, whichever event occurs first, if the holder has filed a properly completed renewal application with the Commissioner on or before March 31 of the permit year for which the current permit was issued.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.6; 1995, c. 104; 2002, c. 473; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 552, 564.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and designated the existing provisions of the section as subsection A, and therein, in the first sentence, deleted “and manufacturers permit year for all contractor-applicators”
following “distributors” and in the last sentence, deleted “permit” following “license” throughout and “be issued to” preceding “expire,” inserted “properly completed” and made minor stylistic changes; and added subsection B.

§ 3.2-3606.
Distributor required to obtain license; fee.

It is unlawful for any person whose name appears upon the label of any regulated product as distributor to distribute a regulated product without first obtaining a license to distribute the regulated product in the Commonwealth. The person who distributes the regulated product shall file an application with the Commissioner on a form furnished by the Commissioner, and pay to the Commissioner a license fee of $50.

Any person who distributes a regulated product shall obtain a license prior to distributing any regulated product for each manufacturing location that he operates and that distributes any regulated product within the Commonwealth. The person who distributes a regulated product shall apply for a license on a form furnished by the Commissioner, and pay to the Commissioner a license fee of $50 for each manufacturing location that distributes in the Commonwealth.

The license application shall include the name and address of the applicant and the name and address of the applicant’s distribution points in the Commonwealth.

The licensee shall place the name and address shown on the license on:

The labels of any regulated product, and pertinent invoices thereof, distributed by the licensee in the Commonwealth; and

All storage facilities for any regulated product distributed by the licensee in the Commonwealth.

The licensee shall inform the Commissioner in writing of additional distribution points established during the period of the license.

Any new applicant who fails to obtain a license within 15 working days of notification of the requirement to obtain a license, or any licensee who fails to comply with the license renewal requirements, shall pay a $35 late fee to the Commissioner in addition to the license fee.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.6; 1995, c. 104; 2002, c. 473; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 552, 564.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and in the first sentence in subsection A, deleted “manufacturer or” preceding “distributor”; in the last sentence in subsections A and B, deleted “or approved” following “furnished”; and added subsection F.

§ 3.2-3607.
Product registration and label requirements; exemptions.

In addition to licensing requirements:

Any person who is the guarantor of and who distributes in the Commonwealth any specialty fertilizer shall: (i) apply for registration for such specialty fertilizer with the Commissioner on forms furnished by the Commissioner; (ii) pay to the Commissioner by July 1 of each registration year a registration fee of $50 for each grade under a given brand prior to distributing the fertilizer in the Commonwealth; and (iii) provide labels for each grade under a given brand with the application.

Any person who is the guarantor and who distributes in the Commonwealth a soil amendment or horticultural growing medium shall: (i) apply for registration for such soil amendment or horticultural growing medium with the Commissioner on forms furnished by the Commissioner; (ii) pay to the Commissioner by July 1 of each registration year a registration fee of $100 for each product name or brand of soil amendment or horticultural growing medium prior to distributing the product in the Commonwealth; and (iii) provide labels for each product name or brand with the application.

The Commissioner shall furnish a certificate of registration to the applicant after approval of the registration.

Any person applying for registration of a specialty fertilizer, soil amendment or horticultural growing medium shall include with the application the following information:

For specialty fertilizer, the grade under a given brand; for soil amendments or horticultural growing media, the product name or brand;

The guaranteed analysis;

The name and address of the registrant; and

The quantity statement.

The Commissioner may require verification of any labeling claims for and any composition of any regulated product.

Custom-media and horticultural growing media planted with live plant material are exempt from labeling and registration requirements and inspection fees.

Beginning December 31, 2013, no lawn maintenance fertilizer containing more than zero percent phosphorus or other compounds containing phosphorus, such as phosphate, shall be registered with the Commissioner or offered for sale, distribution, or use in the Commonwealth. This prohibition does not include lawn fertilizer, manipulated manure, yard waste compost, products derived from sewage sludge, soils containing fertilizer, fertilizer products intended primarily for gardening, tree, shrub, and indoor plant application, including nurseries, or reclaimed water. The provisions of this section shall not restrict the continued sale by retailers of any prohibited fertilizer from any existing inventories in stock on December 31, 2013.

Beginning July 1, 2014, only lawn maintenance fertilizer that, when applied in accordance with its directions for use, results in the application of nitrogen at rates that are consistent with the nitrogen application rates recommended for turfgrass in the Virginia Nutrient Management Standards and Criteria shall be registered with the Commissioner or offered for sale, distribution, or use in the Commonwealth. The provisions of this subsection shall not restrict the continued sale by retailers of any prohibited fertilizer from existing inventories in stock on July 1, 2014.

The Commissioner shall give the guarantor or distributor of any unregistered regulated product in commerce in the Commonwealth a grace period of 15 working days from issuance of notification within which to register the regulated product. Any person required to register any regulated product who fails to register the regulated product within the grace period or fails to comply with registration renewal requirements shall pay to the Commissioner a $50 late fee in addition to the registration fee. The Commissioner may issue a stop sale, use, removal or seizure order upon any regulated product until the registration is issued.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.6; 1995, c. 104; 2002, c. 473; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 341, 353, 552, 564; 2012, c. 796.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 341 and 353 are identical, and added subsection G, and redesignated former subsection G as subsection F.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and in subdivision A 1, substituted “who is the guarantor of” for “whose name is on the label of,” and deleted “packaged in containers of 50 pounds or less dry net weight, or five gallons or less liquid net volume” following “specialty fertilizer” and “or approved” following “furnished”; in subdivision A 2, inserted “is the guarantor and who,” and deleted “or approved” following “furnished” and “soil conditioner” following “soil amendment” throughout; in subsection B, substituted “certificate of registration” for “copy of the registration”; in the introductory paragraph in subsection C, deleted “soil conditioner” following “soil amendment” and “a label that includes” following “application”; in subdivision C 1, deleted “soil conditioners” following “soil amendments”; in subsection D, inserted “and any composition of”; and in subsection F, substituted “distributor” for “manufacturer,” inserted “or fails to comply with registration renewal requirements” and made a minor stylistic change.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendment by c. 796 inserted subsection G and redesignated former subsection G as subsection H.

§ 3.2-3607.1.
Consumer education.

The Department, in consultation with representatives of the fertilizer industry, fertilizer retailers, and statewide turf and lawn care organizations, and other interested parties, may develop consumer information and recommended best practices for the application of lawn fertilizer.

The Department shall provide a public listing of contractor-applicators who apply fertilizer on nonagricultural lands and have met the training requirements of §

3.2-3602.1

. The Department shall encourage consumers to consult the listing when hiring a lawn care professional.

History.

2011, cc. 341, 353.

§ 3.2-3607.2.
Sale of deicing agents.

Beginning December 31, 2013, it is unlawful for any person to offer for sale any deicing agent containing urea or other forms of nitrogen or phosphorus intended for application to parking lots, roadways, and sidewalks or other paved surfaces in the Commonwealth. The provisions of this section shall not (i) restrict the continued sale by retailers of any deicing agent from any existing inventories in stock on December 31, 2013, or (ii) prohibit the offer for sale or sale of any deicing agents containing urea to any municipal corporation or political subdivision for the purpose of applying such deicing agents pursuant to subsection B of §

15.2-1123

.

History.

2011, cc. 341, 353; 2013, c. 758.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 758 inserted the clause (i) designator and added clause (ii) of the second sentence, and made a related change.

§ 3.2-3608.
Contractor-applicator permit.

It is unlawful for any person, other than a licensee or an agent of a licensee, to apply any regulated product for profit without first obtaining a permit. In order to obtain a permit the person shall complete an application form furnished by the Commissioner and pay the $50 annual permit fee required to be a contractor-applicator. An employee or agent of a contractor-applicator who holds a valid permit is not required to obtain a permit.

Any person who engages in business as a contractor-applicator for a period of at least 30 days, and who has failed to obtain a permit within 15 working days of notification of the requirement to obtain a permit shall pay a $35 late fee to the Commissioner, in addition to the permit fee. Any permit holder who fails to comply with permit renewal requirements shall pay a $35 late fee to the Commissioner in addition to the permit fee.

An annual permit shall be required for each location or outlet that applies any regulated product.

The contractor-applicator shall guarantee the consumer that the contractor-applicator and the contractor-applicator’s employees or agents applying any regulated product shall comply with all provisions of this chapter and with regulations adopted by the Board, which shall include an assurance of the delivery of the grade of fertilizer as described on the consumer’s invoice.

History.

1994, c. 740, § 3.1-106.6; 1995, c. 104; 2002, c. 473; 2008, c. 860; 2011, cc. 552, 564.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 552 and 564 are identical, and in subsection A, in the first sentence, deleted “distribute or” preceding “apply” and inserted “first,” and in the last sentence, deleted “or pay a fee” from the end; in subsection B, in the first sentence, substituted “obtain a permit within 15 working days of notification of the requirement to obtain a permit shall pay a $35 late fee” for “obtain a license or permit during that period, shall pay a $50 late fee” and deleted “license or” preceding “permit fee,” and added the last sentence; added subsection C; and redesignated former subsection C as subsection D, and therein inserted “and the contractor-applicator’s employees or agents applying any regulated product” and “and with regulations adopted by the Board.”